trunk/src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic.aff
SET UTF-8
FLAG num
NEEDAFFIX 1
CIRCUMFIX 2
PFX 1013 Y 6
PFX 1013 0 y/2 . IVPref-hmA-yu+
PFX 1013 0 wy/2 . IVPref-hmA-yu+
PFX 1013 0 fy/2 . IVPref-hmA-yu+
PFX 1013 0 sy/2 . IVPref-hmA-yu+
PFX 1013 0 wsy/2 . IVPref-hmA-yu+
PFX 1013 0 fsy/2 . IVPref-hmA-yu+
PFX 1056 Y 12
PFX 1056 0 |/2 . IVPref-AnA-|+
PFX 1056 0 w|/2 . IVPref-AnA-|+
PFX 1056 0 f|/2 . IVPref-AnA-|+
PFX 1056 0 s|/2 . IVPref-AnA-|+
PFX 1056 0 ws|/2 . IVPref-AnA-|+
PFX 1056 0 fs|/2 . IVPref-AnA-|+
PFX 1056 0 A/2 . IVPref-AnA-|+
PFX 1056 0 wA/2 . IVPref-AnA-|+
PFX 1056 0 fA/2 . IVPref-AnA-|+
PFX 1056 0 sA/2 . IVPref-AnA-|+
PFX 1056 0 wsA/2 . IVPref-AnA-|+
PFX 1056 0 fsA/2 . IVPref-AnA-|+
PFX 1041 Y 3
PFX 1041 0 lt/2 . IVPref-hy-litu+
PFX 1041 0 wlt/2 . IVPref-hy-litu+
PFX 1041 0 flt/2 . IVPref-hy-litu+
PFX 1004 Y 1
PFX 1004 0 l/2 . NPref-La+
PFX 1018 Y 3
PFX 1018 0 ly/2 . IVPref-hw-liya+
PFX 1018 0 wly/2 . IVPref-hw-liya+
PFX 1018 0 fly/2 . IVPref-hw-liya+
PFX 1025 Y 3
PFX 1025 0 ly/2 . IVPref-hn-liyu+
PFX 1025 0 wly/2 . IVPref-hn-liyu+
PFX 1025 0 fly/2 . IVPref-hn-liyu+
PFX 1008 Y 3
PFX 1008 0 ll/2 . NPref-Lil+
PFX 1008 0 wll/2 . NPref-Lil+
PFX 1008 0 fll/2 . NPref-Lil+
PFX 1044 Y 3
PFX 1044 0 lt/2 . IVPref-AntmA-lita+
PFX 1044 0 wlt/2 . IVPref-AntmA-lita+
PFX 1044 0 flt/2 . IVPref-AntmA-lita+
PFX 1058 Y 6
PFX 1058 0 l>/2 . IVPref-AnA-li>u+
PFX 1058 0 wl>/2 . IVPref-AnA-li>u+
PFX 1058 0 fl>/2 . IVPref-AnA-li>u+
PFX 1058 0 lA/2 . IVPref-AnA-li>u+
PFX 1058 0 wlA/2 . IVPref-AnA-li>u+
PFX 1058 0 flA/2 . IVPref-AnA-li>u+
PFX 1022 Y 3
PFX 1022 0 ly/2 . IVPref-hm-liya+
PFX 1022 0 wly/2 . IVPref-hm-liya+
PFX 1022 0 fly/2 . IVPref-hm-liya+
PFX 1003 Y 3
PFX 1003 0 l/2 . NPref-Li+
PFX 1003 0 wl/2 . NPref-Li+
PFX 1003 0 fl/2 . NPref-Li+
PFX 1020 Y 3
PFX 1020 0 ly/2 . IVPref-hmA-liya+
PFX 1020 0 wly/2 . IVPref-hmA-liya+
PFX 1020 0 fly/2 . IVPref-hmA-liya+
PFX 1005 Y 1
PFX 1005 0 l/2 . PVPref-La+
PFX 1032 Y 6
PFX 1032 0 t/2 . IVPref-hmA-ta+
PFX 1032 0 wt/2 . IVPref-hmA-ta+
PFX 1032 0 ft/2 . IVPref-hmA-ta+
PFX 1032 0 st/2 . IVPref-hmA-ta+
PFX 1032 0 wst/2 . IVPref-hmA-ta+
PFX 1032 0 fst/2 . IVPref-hmA-ta+
PFX 1054 Y 12
PFX 1054 0 >/2 . IVPref-AnA->a+
PFX 1054 0 w>/2 . IVPref-AnA->a+
PFX 1054 0 f>/2 . IVPref-AnA->a+
PFX 1054 0 s>/2 . IVPref-AnA->a+
PFX 1054 0 ws>/2 . IVPref-AnA->a+
PFX 1054 0 fs>/2 . IVPref-AnA->a+
PFX 1054 0 A/2 . IVPref-AnA->a+
PFX 1054 0 wA/2 . IVPref-AnA->a+
PFX 1054 0 fA/2 . IVPref-AnA->a+
PFX 1054 0 sA/2 . IVPref-AnA->a+
PFX 1054 0 wsA/2 . IVPref-AnA->a+
PFX 1054 0 fsA/2 . IVPref-AnA->a+
PFX 1010 Y 6
PFX 1010 0 y/2 . IVPref-hw-ya+
PFX 1010 0 wy/2 . IVPref-hw-ya+
PFX 1010 0 fy/2 . IVPref-hw-ya+
PFX 1010 0 sy/2 . IVPref-hw-ya+
PFX 1010 0 wsy/2 . IVPref-hw-ya+
PFX 1010 0 fsy/2 . IVPref-hw-ya+
PFX 1019 Y 3
PFX 1019 0 ly/2 . IVPref-hw-liyu+
PFX 1019 0 wly/2 . IVPref-hw-liyu+
PFX 1019 0 fly/2 . IVPref-hw-liyu+
PFX 1045 Y 3
PFX 1045 0 lt/2 . IVPref-AntmA-litu+
PFX 1045 0 wlt/2 . IVPref-AntmA-litu+
PFX 1045 0 flt/2 . IVPref-AntmA-litu+
PFX 1028 Y 6
PFX 1028 0 t/2 . IVPref-Anta-ta+
PFX 1028 0 wt/2 . IVPref-Anta-ta+
PFX 1028 0 ft/2 . IVPref-Anta-ta+
PFX 1028 0 st/2 . IVPref-Anta-ta+
PFX 1028 0 wst/2 . IVPref-Anta-ta+
PFX 1028 0 fst/2 . IVPref-Anta-ta+
PFX 1023 Y 3
PFX 1023 0 ly/2 . IVPref-hm-liyu+
PFX 1023 0 wly/2 . IVPref-hm-liyu+
PFX 1023 0 fly/2 . IVPref-hm-liyu+
PFX 1034 Y 6
PFX 1034 0 t/2 . IVPref-Anti-ta+
PFX 1034 0 wt/2 . IVPref-Anti-ta+
PFX 1034 0 ft/2 . IVPref-Anti-ta+
PFX 1034 0 st/2 . IVPref-Anti-ta+
PFX 1034 0 wst/2 . IVPref-Anti-ta+
PFX 1034 0 fst/2 . IVPref-Anti-ta+
PFX 1021 Y 3
PFX 1021 0 ly/2 . IVPref-hmA-liyu+
PFX 1021 0 wly/2 . IVPref-hmA-liyu+
PFX 1021 0 fly/2 . IVPref-hmA-liyu+
PFX 1033 Y 6
PFX 1033 0 t/2 . IVPref-hmA-tu+
PFX 1033 0 wt/2 . IVPref-hmA-tu+
PFX 1033 0 ft/2 . IVPref-hmA-tu+
PFX 1033 0 st/2 . IVPref-hmA-tu+
PFX 1033 0 wst/2 . IVPref-hmA-tu+
PFX 1033 0 fst/2 . IVPref-hmA-tu+
PFX 1006 Y 3
PFX 1006 0 Al/2 . NPref-Al+
PFX 1006 0 wAl/2 . NPref-Al+
PFX 1006 0 fAl/2 . NPref-Al+
PFX 1055 Y 12
PFX 1055 0 >/2 . IVPref-AnA->u+
PFX 1055 0 w>/2 . IVPref-AnA->u+
PFX 1055 0 f>/2 . IVPref-AnA->u+
PFX 1055 0 s>/2 . IVPref-AnA->u+
PFX 1055 0 ws>/2 . IVPref-AnA->u+
PFX 1055 0 fs>/2 . IVPref-AnA->u+
PFX 1055 0 A/2 . IVPref-AnA->u+
PFX 1055 0 wA/2 . IVPref-AnA->u+
PFX 1055 0 fA/2 . IVPref-AnA->u+
PFX 1055 0 sA/2 . IVPref-AnA->u+
PFX 1055 0 wsA/2 . IVPref-AnA->u+
PFX 1055 0 fsA/2 . IVPref-AnA->u+
PFX 1011 Y 6
PFX 1011 0 y/2 . IVPref-hw-yu+
PFX 1011 0 wy/2 . IVPref-hw-yu+
PFX 1011 0 fy/2 . IVPref-hw-yu+
PFX 1011 0 sy/2 . IVPref-hw-yu+
PFX 1011 0 wsy/2 . IVPref-hw-yu+
PFX 1011 0 fsy/2 . IVPref-hw-yu+
PFX 1026 Y 6
PFX 1026 0 t/2 . IVPref-hy-ta+
PFX 1026 0 wt/2 . IVPref-hy-ta+
PFX 1026 0 ft/2 . IVPref-hy-ta+
PFX 1026 0 st/2 . IVPref-hy-ta+
PFX 1026 0 wst/2 . IVPref-hy-ta+
PFX 1026 0 fst/2 . IVPref-hy-ta+
PFX 1016 Y 6
PFX 1016 0 y/2 . IVPref-hn-ya+
PFX 1016 0 wy/2 . IVPref-hn-ya+
PFX 1016 0 fy/2 . IVPref-hn-ya+
PFX 1016 0 sy/2 . IVPref-hn-ya+
PFX 1016 0 wsy/2 . IVPref-hn-ya+
PFX 1016 0 fsy/2 . IVPref-hn-ya+
PFX 1042 Y 3
PFX 1042 0 lt/2 . IVPref-Anta-lita+
PFX 1042 0 wlt/2 . IVPref-Anta-lita+
PFX 1042 0 flt/2 . IVPref-Anta-lita+
PFX 1029 Y 6
PFX 1029 0 t/2 . IVPref-Anta-tu+
PFX 1029 0 wt/2 . IVPref-Anta-tu+
PFX 1029 0 ft/2 . IVPref-Anta-tu+
PFX 1029 0 st/2 . IVPref-Anta-tu+
PFX 1029 0 wst/2 . IVPref-Anta-tu+
PFX 1029 0 fst/2 . IVPref-Anta-tu+
PFX 1060 Y 6
PFX 1060 0 n/2 . IVPref-nHn-na+
PFX 1060 0 wn/2 . IVPref-nHn-na+
PFX 1060 0 fn/2 . IVPref-nHn-na+
PFX 1060 0 sn/2 . IVPref-nHn-na+
PFX 1060 0 wsn/2 . IVPref-nHn-na+
PFX 1060 0 fsn/2 . IVPref-nHn-na+
PFX 1035 Y 6
PFX 1035 0 t/2 . IVPref-Anti-tu+
PFX 1035 0 wt/2 . IVPref-Anti-tu+
PFX 1035 0 ft/2 . IVPref-Anti-tu+
PFX 1035 0 st/2 . IVPref-Anti-tu+
PFX 1035 0 wst/2 . IVPref-Anti-tu+
PFX 1035 0 fst/2 . IVPref-Anti-tu+
PFX 1014 Y 6
PFX 1014 0 y/2 . IVPref-hm-ya+
PFX 1014 0 wy/2 . IVPref-hm-ya+
PFX 1014 0 fy/2 . IVPref-hm-ya+
PFX 1014 0 sy/2 . IVPref-hm-ya+
PFX 1014 0 wsy/2 . IVPref-hm-ya+
PFX 1014 0 fsy/2 . IVPref-hm-ya+
PFX 1046 Y 3
PFX 1046 0 lt/2 . IVPref-hmA-lita+
PFX 1046 0 wlt/2 . IVPref-hmA-lita+
PFX 1046 0 flt/2 . IVPref-hmA-lita+
PFX 1027 Y 6
PFX 1027 0 t/2 . IVPref-hy-tu+
PFX 1027 0 wt/2 . IVPref-hy-tu+
PFX 1027 0 ft/2 . IVPref-hy-tu+
PFX 1027 0 st/2 . IVPref-hy-tu+
PFX 1027 0 wst/2 . IVPref-hy-tu+
PFX 1027 0 fst/2 . IVPref-hy-tu+
PFX 1017 Y 6
PFX 1017 0 y/2 . IVPref-hn-yu+
PFX 1017 0 wy/2 . IVPref-hn-yu+
PFX 1017 0 fy/2 . IVPref-hn-yu+
PFX 1017 0 sy/2 . IVPref-hn-yu+
PFX 1017 0 wsy/2 . IVPref-hn-yu+
PFX 1017 0 fsy/2 . IVPref-hn-yu+
PFX 1043 Y 3
PFX 1043 0 lt/2 . IVPref-Anta-litu+
PFX 1043 0 wlt/2 . IVPref-Anta-litu+
PFX 1043 0 flt/2 . IVPref-Anta-litu+
PFX 1052 Y 3
PFX 1052 0 lt/2 . IVPref-Antn-lita+
PFX 1052 0 wlt/2 . IVPref-Antn-lita+
PFX 1052 0 flt/2 . IVPref-Antn-lita+
PFX 1030 Y 6
PFX 1030 0 t/2 . IVPref-AntmA-ta+
PFX 1030 0 wt/2 . IVPref-AntmA-ta+
PFX 1030 0 ft/2 . IVPref-AntmA-ta+
PFX 1030 0 st/2 . IVPref-AntmA-ta+
PFX 1030 0 wst/2 . IVPref-AntmA-ta+
PFX 1030 0 fst/2 . IVPref-AntmA-ta+
PFX 1048 Y 3
PFX 1048 0 lt/2 . IVPref-Anti-lita+
PFX 1048 0 wlt/2 . IVPref-Anti-lita+
PFX 1048 0 flt/2 . IVPref-Anti-lita+
PFX 1062 Y 3
PFX 1062 0 ln/2 . IVPref-nHn-lina+
PFX 1062 0 wln/2 . IVPref-nHn-lina+
PFX 1062 0 fln/2 . IVPref-nHn-lina+
PFX 1061 Y 6
PFX 1061 0 n/2 . IVPref-nHn-nu+
PFX 1061 0 wn/2 . IVPref-nHn-nu+
PFX 1061 0 fn/2 . IVPref-nHn-nu+
PFX 1061 0 sn/2 . IVPref-nHn-nu+
PFX 1061 0 wsn/2 . IVPref-nHn-nu+
PFX 1061 0 fsn/2 . IVPref-nHn-nu+
PFX 1015 Y 6
PFX 1015 0 y/2 . IVPref-hm-yu+
PFX 1015 0 wy/2 . IVPref-hm-yu+
PFX 1015 0 fy/2 . IVPref-hm-yu+
PFX 1015 0 sy/2 . IVPref-hm-yu+
PFX 1015 0 wsy/2 . IVPref-hm-yu+
PFX 1015 0 fsy/2 . IVPref-hm-yu+
PFX 1001 Y 2
PFX 1001 0 w/2 . Pref-Wa+
PFX 1001 0 f/2 . Pref-Wa+
PFX 1047 Y 3
PFX 1047 0 lt/2 . IVPref-hmA-litu+
PFX 1047 0 wlt/2 . IVPref-hmA-litu+
PFX 1047 0 flt/2 . IVPref-hmA-litu+
PFX 1038 Y 6
PFX 1038 0 t/2 . IVPref-Antn-ta+
PFX 1038 0 wt/2 . IVPref-Antn-ta+
PFX 1038 0 ft/2 . IVPref-Antn-ta+
PFX 1038 0 st/2 . IVPref-Antn-ta+
PFX 1038 0 wst/2 . IVPref-Antn-ta+
PFX 1038 0 fst/2 . IVPref-Antn-ta+
PFX 1059 Y 6
PFX 1059 0 l|/2 . IVPref-AnA-li|+
PFX 1059 0 wl|/2 . IVPref-AnA-li|+
PFX 1059 0 fl|/2 . IVPref-AnA-li|+
PFX 1059 0 lA/2 . IVPref-AnA-li|+
PFX 1059 0 wlA/2 . IVPref-AnA-li|+
PFX 1059 0 flA/2 . IVPref-AnA-li|+
PFX 1053 Y 3
PFX 1053 0 lt/2 . IVPref-Antn-litu+
PFX 1053 0 wlt/2 . IVPref-Antn-litu+
PFX 1053 0 flt/2 . IVPref-Antn-litu+
PFX 1031 Y 6
PFX 1031 0 t/2 . IVPref-AntmA-tu+
PFX 1031 0 wt/2 . IVPref-AntmA-tu+
PFX 1031 0 ft/2 . IVPref-AntmA-tu+
PFX 1031 0 st/2 . IVPref-AntmA-tu+
PFX 1031 0 wst/2 . IVPref-AntmA-tu+
PFX 1031 0 fst/2 . IVPref-AntmA-tu+
PFX 1009 Y 3
PFX 1009 0 l/2 . NPref-LiAl+
PFX 1009 0 wl/2 . NPref-LiAl+
PFX 1009 0 fl/2 . NPref-LiAl+
PFX 1049 Y 3
PFX 1049 0 lt/2 . IVPref-Anti-litu+
PFX 1049 0 wlt/2 . IVPref-Anti-litu+
PFX 1049 0 flt/2 . IVPref-Anti-litu+
PFX 1036 Y 6
PFX 1036 0 t/2 . IVPref-Antm-ta+
PFX 1036 0 wt/2 . IVPref-Antm-ta+
PFX 1036 0 ft/2 . IVPref-Antm-ta+
PFX 1036 0 st/2 . IVPref-Antm-ta+
PFX 1036 0 wst/2 . IVPref-Antm-ta+
PFX 1036 0 fst/2 . IVPref-Antm-ta+
PFX 1063 Y 3
PFX 1063 0 ln/2 . IVPref-nHn-linu+
PFX 1063 0 wln/2 . IVPref-nHn-linu+
PFX 1063 0 fln/2 . IVPref-nHn-linu+
PFX 1050 Y 3
PFX 1050 0 lt/2 . IVPref-Antm-lita+
PFX 1050 0 wlt/2 . IVPref-Antm-lita+
PFX 1050 0 flt/2 . IVPref-Antm-lita+
PFX 1012 Y 6
PFX 1012 0 y/2 . IVPref-hmA-ya+
PFX 1012 0 wy/2 . IVPref-hmA-ya+
PFX 1012 0 fy/2 . IVPref-hmA-ya+
PFX 1012 0 sy/2 . IVPref-hmA-ya+
PFX 1012 0 wsy/2 . IVPref-hmA-ya+
PFX 1012 0 fsy/2 . IVPref-hmA-ya+
PFX 1039 Y 6
PFX 1039 0 t/2 . IVPref-Antn-tu+
PFX 1039 0 wt/2 . IVPref-Antn-tu+
PFX 1039 0 ft/2 . IVPref-Antn-tu+
PFX 1039 0 st/2 . IVPref-Antn-tu+
PFX 1039 0 wst/2 . IVPref-Antn-tu+
PFX 1039 0 fst/2 . IVPref-Antn-tu+
PFX 1002 Y 6
PFX 1002 0 b/2 . NPref-Bi+
PFX 1002 0 k/2 . NPref-Bi+
PFX 1002 0 wb/2 . NPref-Bi+
PFX 1002 0 fb/2 . NPref-Bi+
PFX 1002 0 wk/2 . NPref-Bi+
PFX 1002 0 fk/2 . NPref-Bi+
PFX 1000 Y 1
PFX 1000 0 0/2 . Pref-0+
PFX 1040 Y 3
PFX 1040 0 lt/2 . IVPref-hy-lita+
PFX 1040 0 wlt/2 . IVPref-hy-lita+
PFX 1040 0 flt/2 . IVPref-hy-lita+
PFX 1024 Y 3
PFX 1024 0 ly/2 . IVPref-hn-liya+
PFX 1024 0 wly/2 . IVPref-hn-liya+
PFX 1024 0 fly/2 . IVPref-hn-liya+
PFX 1007 Y 6
PFX 1007 0 bAl/2 . NPref-BiAl+
PFX 1007 0 kAl/2 . NPref-BiAl+
PFX 1007 0 wbAl/2 . NPref-BiAl+
PFX 1007 0 fbAl/2 . NPref-BiAl+
PFX 1007 0 wkAl/2 . NPref-BiAl+
PFX 1007 0 fkAl/2 . NPref-BiAl+
PFX 1057 Y 6
PFX 1057 0 l>/2 . IVPref-AnA-li>a+
PFX 1057 0 wl>/2 . IVPref-AnA-li>a+
PFX 1057 0 fl>/2 . IVPref-AnA-li>a+
PFX 1057 0 lA/2 . IVPref-AnA-li>a+
PFX 1057 0 wlA/2 . IVPref-AnA-li>a+
PFX 1057 0 flA/2 . IVPref-AnA-li>a+
PFX 1037 Y 6
PFX 1037 0 t/2 . IVPref-Antm-tu+
PFX 1037 0 wt/2 . IVPref-Antm-tu+
PFX 1037 0 ft/2 . IVPref-Antm-tu+
PFX 1037 0 st/2 . IVPref-Antm-tu+
PFX 1037 0 wst/2 . IVPref-Antm-tu+
PFX 1037 0 fst/2 . IVPref-Antm-tu+
PFX 1051 Y 3
PFX 1051 0 lt/2 . IVPref-Antm-litu+
PFX 1051 0 wlt/2 . IVPref-Antm-litu+
PFX 1051 0 flt/2 . IVPref-Antm-litu+
SFX 497 Y 5
SFX 497 0 k/2,1012 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 497 0 k/2,1012 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 497 0 kmA/2,1012 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 497 0 km/2,1012 . +IVSuff-|k
SFX 497 0 kn/2,1012 . +IVSuff-|k
